North Dakota statutes. TITLE 27 Judicial Branch of Government
CHAPTER 27-02.1 Court of Appeals

27-02.1-01.
Temporary court of appeals established — Jurisdiction — Writ authority — Administration. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

A temporary court of appeals is established to exercise appellate and original jurisdiction as delegated by the supreme court. Panels of the temporary court of appeals may issue original and remedial writs necessary to properly exercise jurisdiction in cases assigned to them. The panels of the temporary court of appeals are subject to administration by the supreme court pursuant to sections 3 and 8 of article VI of the Constitution of North Dakota.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 1; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 1; 2007, ch. 272, § 1; 2011, ch. 226, § 1; 2015, ch. 226, §
1; 2019, ch. 2, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by
section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by
section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by
section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by
section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-02.
Number, assignment, and compensation of judges. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

The supreme court may provide for the assignment of active or retired district court judges, retired justices of the supreme court, and lawyers, to serve on three-judge panels of the temporary court of appeals if the chief justice certifies to the governor that the supreme court has disposed of two hundred fifty cases in the twelve months preceding September first of any year. Assignments may be made for a time certain, not to exceed one year from the date of assignment, or specifically for one or more cases on the docket of the supreme court.

An active or retired district court judge serving on the temporary court of appeals may not be assigned to hear cases in which the judge participated while serving on the district court. An active district court judge may not be assigned to hear cases that originated in the judicial district of the judge.

An active district court judge serving on the temporary court of appeals is not entitled to additional compensation, but is entitled to reimbursement for expenses as provided by sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09.

Retired justices of the supreme court, retired district court judges, and lawyers serving as judges on panels of the temporary court of appeals are entitled to receive as compensation for each day of service in the performance of duties pursuant to the assignment an amount equal to five percent of the gross monthly salary as provided for a regularly elected or appointed justice of the supreme court, or one-half of the daily compensation for services of one-half day or less. The compensation must be paid upon certification by the judge that the services were performed for the number of days shown on the certificate and must be paid in the same manner as the salaries of the regularly elected or appointed judges are paid.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 2; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 2; 2007, ch. 272, § 2; 2011, ch. 226, § 2; 2015, ch. 226, §
2; 2019, ch. 2, § 6, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 2 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-03.
Assignment and reassignment of cases — Quorum for decision of cases — Authority in furtherance of jurisdiction. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

Panels of the temporary court of appeals have jurisdiction to hear and to decide all cases assigned by the supreme court.

The supreme court may order reassignment of any case from a panel of the temporary court of appeals to the supreme court.

A majority of the three judges of a panel of the temporary court of appeals hearing a case is necessary to pronounce a decision.

When a judgment or order is reversed, modified, or confirmed by a panel of the temporary court of appeals, the reasons must be concisely stated in writing, signed by the judges concurring, filed in the office of the clerk of the supreme court, and preserved with the record of the case. Any judge concurring or dissenting may give the reasons for the judge’s concurrence or dissent in writing over the judge’s signature.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 3; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 3; 2007, ch. 272, § 3; 2011, ch. 226, § 3; 2015, ch. 226, §
3; 2019, ch. 2, § 7, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 3 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-04.
Administration — Employees and clerical assistance — Court of record — Place of sessions. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

The clerk of the supreme court shall provide clerk services to panels of the temporary court of appeals.

Panels of the temporary court of appeals may hold court in any place the panel considers convenient and efficient for conducting its business.

All proceedings of the panels of the temporary court of appeals must be pursuant to the rules adopted by the supreme court.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 4; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 4; 2007, ch. 272, § 4; 2011, ch. 226, § 4; 2015, ch. 226, §
4; 2019, ch. 2, § 8, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 4 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-05.
Chief judge. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

The chief justice of the supreme court shall designate a chief judge of each panel of the temporary court of appeals who shall preside pursuant to rules of the supreme court.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 5; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 5; 2007, ch. 272, § 5; 2011, ch. 226, § 5; 2015, ch. 226, §
5; 2019, ch. 2, § 9, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 5 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-06.
Review of decisions of panels. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

Any party in interest who is aggrieved by a judgment or order of a panel of the temporary court of appeals may petition the supreme court for review of the judgment or order pursuant to rules of the supreme court. Upon the filing of a petition for review by the supreme court, the order or judgment and mandate of the panel of the temporary court of appeals is stayed pending action of the supreme court. The supreme court has discretion to grant or deny the petition.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 6; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 6; 2007, ch. 272, § 6; 2011, ch. 226, § 6; 2015, ch. 226, §
6; 2019, ch. 2, § 10, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 6 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-07.
Right to appeal not created. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

This chapter does not provide or create a right of appeal if that right is not otherwise provided by law. An appeal assigned to a panel of the temporary court of appeals fulfills the right of appeal provided by section 28-27-02.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 7; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 7; 2007, ch. 272, § 7; 2011, ch. 226, § 7; 2015, ch. 226, §
7; 2019, ch. 2, § 11, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 7 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-08.
Unitary appeal — Filing of appeal — Filing fee. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

All appeals must be treated as one appeal process under the jurisdiction of the supreme court. In any appeal there may be only one filing and one filing fee required. The filing fee is as prescribed by section 27-03-05.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 8; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 8; 2007, ch. 272, § 8; 2011, ch. 226, § 8; 2015, ch. 226, §
8; 2019, ch. 2, § 12, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 8 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, and through January 1, 2024, by section 1 of chapter 226, 1076, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.

27-02.1-09.
Publication of opinions. [Effective through January 1, 2024]

Opinions of the panels of the temporary court of appeals may be published pursuant to rules of the supreme court.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 374, § 9; 1989, ch. 379, § 1; 1993, ch. 24, § 6; 1995, ch. 294, § 1; 1999, ch. 277, § 1; 2003, ch. 264, § 9; 2007, ch. 272, § 9; 2011, ch. 226, § 9; 2015, ch. 226, §
9; 2019, ch. 2, § 13, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment by section 9 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, to this section was to extend the expiration date from January 1, 2016 to January 1, 2020.

This chapter was initially effective July 1, 1987 through January 1, 1990, pursuant to S.L. 1987, chapter 374, § 15, and was extended through January 1, 1994, by
section 1, chapter 379, S.L. 1989; through January 1, 1996, by
section 6 of chapter 24, S.L. 1993; through January 1, 2000, by
section 1 of chapter 294, S.L. 1995; through January 1, 2004, by
section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 1999; through January 1, 2008, by
section 1 of chapter 264, S.L. 2003, through January 1, 2012, by
section 2 of chapter 272, S.L. 2007, through January 1, 2016, by
section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2011, through January 1, 2024, by
section 1 of chapter 226, S.L. 2015, and through January 1, 2020, by
section 5 of chapter 2, S.L. 2019.